Hawaii, session 2026, SB2545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Act 99, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024 (Act 99), requires the transfer of the Maui state veterans home to a state agency having a Maui affiliation. The legislature also finds that the Maui state veterans home is a proposed long-term health care facility that is anticipated to offer skilled nursing, rehabilitation therapies, and hospice, Alzheimer's disease, and respite care.  The legislature passed Act 99 in recognition that this facility should be placed under a state agency having the expertise to manage a long-term care facility. Act 99 required the assimilation of the Maui state veterans home into a state agency no later than June 30, 2027.  However, the legislature finds that the transfer of the Maui state veterans home is highly complex because of logistical, labor relations, and financial issues.  Therefore, it is necessary to reexamine this deadline to ensure that the intent of Act 99, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, is properly achieved. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is repeal the June 30, 2027, deadline for the transfer of the Maui state veterans home and instead require the transfer of the Maui state veterans home to be completed as soon as practicable. SECTION 2. Section 3 of Act 99, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) [No later than June 30, 2027,] As soon as practicable, the Maui state veterans home shall be assimilated into a state agency having a Maui affiliation, in a manner and to an extent that may be negotiated between the Oahu regional health care system or state agency having a Maui affiliation and the department of defense.  After assimilation, the physical assets and the ground lease of the Maui state veterans home shall become the property of and be managed by the agency into which the Maui state veterans home is assimilated." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________